Arkansas, session 2025, HB1646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 25, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-25-107. Certain materials limited.
(a) A library media center located in a public school building that is
configured as an elementary school and in which kindergarten through grade
five (K-5) students are enrolled shall store non-age-appropriate sexual
content, including without limitation a book or other resource that is
located in the library media center that is available to the public, in a
locked compartment within a designated area.
(b) A library media center located in a public school building that is
configured as an elementary school and in which kindergarten through grade
five (K-5) students are enrolled shall not allow a student enrolled in the
school to view or check out a book or other resource that concerns non-age-
appropriate sexual content and that is stored in a locked compartment within
a designated area unless the library media center receives prior written
*TNL128*
03-31-2025 12:02:58 TNL128

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/31/25 HB1646
approval from the student's parent, legal guardian, or person standing in
loco parentis to the student.
(c)(1) An allegation that an individual knowingly failed to comply
with this section for the first time shall be documented by the principal of
the public school at which the individual is employed and by the
superintendent of the public school district in which the individual is
employed.
(2) A public school principal and public school district
superintendent may suspend an individual who is found to have knowingly
failed to comply with this section for a maximum of five (5) days without
pay.
(d)(1) An allegation that an individual knowingly failed to comply
with this section a second time shall be referred to the Professional
Licensure Standards Board by filing a formal complaint.
(2) The board may suspend the teaching license of an individual
who is found to have knowingly failed to comply with this section a second
time.
(e) If an individual is found to have knowingly failed to comply with
this section a third time, the board shall revoke the individual's teaching
license.
(f) As used in this section, "non-age-appropriate sexual content" means any
materials that include explicit instruction, promotion, or advocacy of sexual
ideology, behaviors, or orientations that are not developmentally appropriate
for kindergarten through grade five (K-5) students.

/s/McGrew










03-31-2025 12:02:58 TNL128